Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 1
FEES - GENERAL

Cross references:

For fees of county officers, see § 15 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.

Section

30-1-101. Classification of counties - fixing fees.

For the purpose of fixing fees, chargeable and to be collected by county and other officers, and for no other purpose, the several counties of this state are divided into five classes, which classes shall be known as the first, second, third, fourth, and fifth, as follows:

The city and county of Denver is a county of the first class;

The counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Pueblo, and Weld are counties of the second class;

The counties of Delta, Garfield, Larimer, Las Animas, Logan, Mesa, Montezuma, Montrose, Morgan, and Otero are counties of the third class;

The counties of Alamosa, Archuleta, Bent, city and county of Broomfield, Chaffee, Cheyenne, Clear Creek, Conejos, Costilla, Crowley, Eagle, Elbert, Fremont, Gilpin, Gunnison, Huerfano, Kit Carson, Lake, La Plata, Lincoln, Ouray, Park, Phillips, Prowers, Rio Grande, Routt, Saguache, San Miguel, Sedgwick, Teller, Washington, and Yuma are counties of the fourth class;

The counties of Baca, Custer, Dolores, Grand, Hinsdale, Jackson, Kiowa, Mineral, Moffat, Pitkin, Rio Blanco, San Juan, and Summit are counties of the fifth class.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 200, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2521.

L. 13:

p. 276, § 1.

C.L.

§ 7869.

L. 25:

p. 243, § 1.

CSA:

C. 66, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-1.

L. 69:

p. 385, § 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 330, § 1, effective April 12; (1)(d) amended, p. 256, § 2, effective November 15.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended, (HB 09-1203), ch. 102, p. 377, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(d) by Senate Bill 01-102 and Senate Bill 01-130 were harmonized.

30-1-102. Fees of county treasurer.

The county treasurer shall charge and receive the following fees:

Upon all money received by him or her for town and city taxes except as otherwise provided in section 42-3-107 (24)(c), whether such towns or cities are incorporated under the general laws or by special charter, and anything in said charter to the contrary notwithstanding, and upon all school taxes in counties of the first class, one percent; in counties of the second class, one percent; in counties of every other class, one percent on school taxes and two percent on town and city taxes; except that a collection fee not exceeding one-quarter of one percent shall be charged as provided in section 22-54-119 and no collection fee shall be charged on other school taxes exempt by law from said collection fees;

Upon all moneys received by him for taxes of every other kind in counties of the first class, one percent; second class, one and one-half percent; third class, two percent; fourth class, three percent; fifth class, five percent;

For receiving all moneys other than taxes, one percent, except moneys received from all federal funds derived from any and all sources. No collection fees shall be charged upon any moneys collected and distributed under the provisions of sections 22-54-106 and 22-54-115, C.R.S., or upon other school moneys exempt by law from said collection fees;

Repealed.

For advertising delinquent personal property taxes, ten dollars or the cost of advertising, whichever is greater;

For certifying the amount of taxes due on any parcel of real estate, and for certifying outstanding sales for unpaid taxes with the amount required for redemption, ten dollars for each certificate;

In connection with a sale for delinquent taxes, for advertising each property description that is separately identified by its own parcel number for general property tax purposes, the estimated cost of advertising but not less than ten dollars;

Repealed.

For each certificate of purchase delivered, four dollars;

For endorsing the amount of subsequent taxes paid on tax certificates and the date of payment in the book of tax sales, five dollars for each certificate;

For processing an application for treasurer's deed, thirty-five dollars if the application is not advertised and seventy-five dollars if the application is advertised;

For the assignment of a certificate of purchase, made to the county, city, town, or city and county at any tax sale, to a person desiring to purchase land covered by such certificate, four dollars;

For each notice of purchase required by section 39-11-128 (1), C.R.S., to be served before a treasurer's deed may be issued, the cost of publication in a newspaper where such publication is required;

For each certificate of redemption delivered, seven dollars;

For services in collecting drainage district assessments, such amount as the board of directors of the district may allow, but not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars per annum;

For services in collecting irrigation district assessments, such amount as the board of directors of the district may allow, but not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars per annum;

For services rendered in handling the payment of principal and interest on bonds of a school district, such amount as the county treasurer and the board of education shall agree upon, which shall be determined in accordance with the prevailing rate charged for similar services rendered by commercial banks in the state of Colorado;

For preparation of a distraint warrant, fifteen dollars;

For research, the amounts specified in section 24-72-205;

For the notice, computation, and recording provided in section 32-1-1604, C.R.S., thirty dollars.

(1.5) The county treasurer may charge and receive the fee specified in section 42-4-510 (2)(a) for issuing an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes and a transportable manufactured home permit.

None of the provisions of this section shall be applicable to any moneys received or collected by any county treasurer for any hospital established under the provisions of part 3 of article 3 of title 25, C.R.S., or for any health service district embracing only an entire county established under the provisions of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S.

In addition to any other fees to which the county treasurer is entitled and notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, the county treasurer may charge an administrative fee of five dollars when the payment of any real property tax statement, exclusive of any license fees collected pursuant to sections 35-40-205 and 35-57.5-116, C.R.S., is less than ten dollars. The fee shall be credited to the county general fund, pursuant to section 30-25-105, to cover the cost of processing such tax statement.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 211, § 6.

L. 1897:

p. 159, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2537.

C.L.

§ 7887.

CSA:

C. 66, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-2.

L. 55:

p. 385, § 1.

L. 56:

p. 147, §§ 1, 2.

L. 59:

p. 441, § 1.

L. 63:

p. 490, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-2.

L. 71:

p. 325, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 1433, § 1.

L. 75:

(1)(i), (1)(k), and (1)(n) amended, p. 1478, § 1, effective June 26.

L. 79:

(1)(q) added, p. 792, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1612, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(3) added, p. 813, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 1202, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 88:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 823, § 35, effective May 24; (1)(d), (1)(f), (1)(g), and (1)(i) to (1)(n) amended and (1)(r) and (1)(s) added, p. 1105, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

L. 90:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1695, § 15, effective June 9.

L. 91:

(1)(h) repealed, p. 1972, § 1, effective March 27; (1)(t) added, p. 2426, § 7, effective June 8.

L. 94:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 824, § 53, effective April 27.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 1105, § 45, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 472, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 182, § 13, effective March 31.

L. 99:

(1)(a) amended, p. 177, § 5, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2020:

(1)(a) and (1)(s) amended, (1)(d) repealed, and (1.5) added, (HB 20-1077), ch. 80, p. 323, § 1, effective September 14.

30-1-103. Fees of county clerk and recorders.

Fees collected by county clerk and recorders shall be as follows: For filing or recording each document for which a fee is not specifically provided, except tax schedules and claims against the county, for which no fee shall be allowed, in cities and counties and in counties of every class, the clerk shall receive ten dollars for the first page and five dollars for each additional page.

In cities and counties and in every county, the following fees shall apply:

For taking and certifying each affidavit, two dollars;

For each certificate and seal, one dollar;

For filing each bond and license, five dollars;

For certificate of magistracy under seal, two dollars;

For taking acknowledgments, two dollars;

For recording town plats, subdivision plats, and all other plats, and for recording all documents in excess of eight and one-half inches in width or fourteen inches in length, ten dollars per sheet;

For entering subsequent taxes paid in tax sale record, five dollars for each certificate;

For entering certificate of redemption in tax sale record, five dollars for each certificate;

Repealed.

For copies of records, a fee in an amount determined pursuant to section 24-72-205 (5), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

For recording all certificates, affidavits, deeds, or other documents containing the name of one or more mining claims and for indexing the same under the name of each such mining claim, five dollars per page, plus twenty-five cents for each mining claim named therein.

County governments shall be exempt from all fees authorized to be collected under the provisions of this section whenever the county or any agency thereof is the grantor or grantee of the document being recorded or whenever a delegate child support enforcement unit files or records documents for the purpose of collecting child support, child support arrears, maintenance, maintenance when combined with child support, retroactive support, or child support debt.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1007), ch. 71, p. 243, § 1, effective April 5, 2010.)

The fee described in subsection (1) of this section shall not be collected on any filing received by the county clerk and recorder as an authorized agent of the executive director of the department of revenue pursuant to section 38-29-128 or 42-6-121, C.R.S., in which case the fee collected shall be five dollars per page.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 212, § 7.

L. 07:

p. 404, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2538.

C.L.

§ 7888.

L. 21:

p. 321, § 2.

CSA:

C. 66, § 26.

L. 51:

p. 382, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-3.

L. 57:

p. 376, § 1.

L. 58:

p. 239, § 1.

L. 63:

p. 928, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-3.

L. 65:

p. 624, § 1.

L. 73:

pp. 631, 633, §§ 2, 7.

L. 77:

(2)(k) repealed, p. 1427, § 1, effective May 26; (3) added, p. 1428, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 81:

(1), (2)(c), (2)(g), (2)(h), (2)(l), and (2)(m) amended, p. 383, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 83:

(2)(a) and (2)(e) amended and (2)(i) and (2)(l) repealed, pp. 1226, 1231, §§ 4, 22, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(m) amended, p. 1107, § 1, effective January 1, 1989.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1271, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2)(b) to (2)(d), (2)(g), (2)(h), and (2)(m) amended, p. 708, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(m.1) added, p. 1106, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1), (2)(m), and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 1555, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 565, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(j) amended, p. 579, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2010:

(1) and (4) amended and (5) added, (HB 10-1007), ch. 71, p. 243, § 1, effective April 5.

30-1-104. Fees of sheriff.

Fees collected by sheriffs shall be as follows:

For serving and returning summonses or other writ of process in a criminal action not specified in this section, with or without complaint attached, on each party served, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than fifteen dollars;

For serving and returning a summons or other writ of process in other than a criminal action not specified in this section, with or without complaint attached, on each party served, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty-five dollars;

For making a return on a summons in a criminal action not served, for each party, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than five dollars;

For making a return on a summons in other than a criminal action not served, for each party, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than twenty dollars;

For serving and returning each subpoena in a criminal action on each witness, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than seven dollars and fifty cents;

For serving and returning each subpoena in other than a criminal action on each witness, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than sixty dollars;

For making return on a subpoena in a criminal action not served, in counties of every class, five dollars;

For making a return on a subpoena in other than a criminal action not served, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than twenty dollars;

For serving each juror in counties of every class, ten dollars;

For serving and returning writ of attachment or replevin on each party, in counties of every class, mileage, as described in paragraph (h.5) of this subsection (1), and actual expenses;

For serving garnishee summons on each party, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than twenty dollars;

Mileage for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in serving each writ, subpoena, or other process in a criminal action, not less than twelve cents nor more than the maximum mileage allowance provided for state officers and employees under section 24-9-104, C.R.S., as determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of each county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county; except that actual and not constructive mileage shall be allowed in all cases; and, where more than one warrant is served by any officer on one trip, the actual mileage only shall be allowed such officer, and the actual mileage shall be apportioned among the several warrants served on the trip;

For mileage:

Not to exceed the mileage rate authorized for county officials and employees pursuant to section 30-11-107 (1)(t), for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in serving each writ, subpoena, or other process in an action other than a criminal action; or

A sheriff may establish a zone- or zip code-based mileage fee structure. The zone- or zip code-based mileage fee structure shall establish a single mileage fee for the service of any writ, subpoena, or other process in an action, other than a criminal action, in each separate zone or zip code, as applicable, in the county. The applicable single mileage fee for a zone or zip code shall be charged for all papers served in the zone or zip code regardless of the number of attempts or actual mileage traveled by a sheriff within the zone or zip code during a sheriff's operational period. The single mileage fees for each zone or zip code shall be set by resolution of the board of county commissioners for the county and posted pursuant to section 30-1-108.

In making demand for payment on executions when payment is not made, in counties of every class, one dollar;

For levying execution or writ of attachment, besides actual custodial and transportation costs necessarily incurred in counties of every class, mileage, as described in paragraph (h.5) of this subsection (1), and actual expenses;

For levying writ of replevin, besides actual custodial and transportation costs necessarily incurred in counties of every class, mileage, as described in paragraph (h.5) of this subsection (1), and actual expenses;

No custodian shall be appointed by the sheriff to take custody of goods by him or her attached, nor shall any deputy be placed in charge thereof, unless the plaintiff or his or her attorney shall request the appointment of such custodian in writing; such custodian or deputy shall receive twelve dollars per diem of twelve hours, or fraction thereof, which shall be taxed as costs in the case;

For making and filing for record a certificate of levy on attachment or other cases, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty dollars;

For committing and discharging convicted prisoners to and from the county jail, in counties of every class, a reasonable fee, not to exceed thirty dollars, which fee shall be collected directly from prisoners at the time of commitment, but shall be refunded to any prisoner who is not convicted;

For serving writ with aid of posse comitatus with actual expenses necessarily incurred in executing said writ, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than sixty dollars; for serving same without aid in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than four dollars;

For attending before any judge, court not being in session, with prisoners with writ of habeas corpus for each day of twelve hours, or fraction thereof, in counties of every class, twelve dollars;

For attending courts of record when in session, per diem of twelve hours, or fraction thereof, in counties of every class, twelve dollars; but the attendance upon the county court shall be certified by the judge of said court at the close of each month;

For advertising property for sale, besides the actual cost of the advertising, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty dollars;

For making certificates of sale previous to execution of deed, or on sales of personal property, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty dollars;

For executing and acknowledging deed of sale of real estate, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than forty dollars;

For taking, approving, and returning bond in any case, in counties of every class, a reasonable fee, not to exceed ten dollars;

For executing capias or warrant in criminal cases, on each prisoner named therein, in counties of every class, two dollars;

For transporting insane or other prisoners, besides the actual expenses necessarily incurred, in counties of every class, not less than twelve cents per mile nor more than the maximum mileage allowance provided for state officers and employees under section 24-9-104, C.R.S., as determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of each county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county, and for the service of mittimus or other process order, whether written or otherwise, in transporting prisoners, in counties of every class, not less than twelve cents per mile nor more than the maximum mileage allowance provided for state officers and employees under section 24-9-104, C.R.S., as determined by resolution of the board of county commissioners of each county or as provided by the charter of a home rule county; except that such mileage shall be only by one officer and no mileage shall be charged upon the guards attending the officer having custody of the prisoner and further except that the guards attending the officer in charge of the prisoner shall receive, besides the expenses necessarily incurred, the sum of twelve dollars per diem of twelve hours, or fraction thereof, to be paid out of the county treasury;

For his or her services in sales of real estate on an execution or decree, order of court, or other court process, besides actual expenses, in counties of every class on all bids under three thousand dollars, twenty dollars; and on all sums bid over three thousand dollars, one percent; but such commission shall in no case exceed the sum of one hundred dollars;

For money collected by sale of personal property, in counties of every class, on all sums bid under five hundred dollars, five percent; on all sums bid over five hundred dollars and under one thousand dollars, six percent; and on all sums bid over one thousand dollars, seven percent; but no fee shall be charged for an auctioneer or other person for making sales of personal property; and in no case shall such commission exceed the sum of one hundred dollars;

For money collected or settlements made without sale, after writ of execution, attachment, or replevin has been placed in his or her hands and levy or demand for payment has been made on the proper party, in counties of every class, on all amounts under five hundred dollars, three percent; on all amounts over five hundred dollars and under one thousand dollars, two percent; and on all amounts over one thousand dollars, one and one-half percent; but the fee in no case shall exceed the sum of one hundred and fifty dollars; and the plaintiff or any person making any settlement shall be liable to the sheriff for such fees;

For pursuing and capturing, or pursuit without capture, when previously authorized by the board of county commissioners, each prisoner charged with the commission of any crime denominated a felony, beyond the limits of said county, in counties of every class, all necessary expenses of such pursuit, upon a verified, itemized account being presented for the same, together with twelve dollars per diem of twelve hours for the time occupied in such pursuit;

For serving and returning writ of ne exeat or body attachment, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than twenty dollars;

For serving copy of execution when making levy on shares of stock under execution, on each party served, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than sixty dollars;

For making certificates of levy on shares, or otherwise, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty dollars;

For making return on execution, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than sixty dollars;

For executing certificate of redemption, in counties of every class, actual expenses, but not more than thirty dollars;

For service and execution of any writ of restitution or order of possession of premises, besides actual transportation costs necessarily incurred in counties of every class, actual expenses not to exceed two hundred dollars; except that a sheriff may charge for actual expenses in excess of two hundred dollars if the work performed exceeds two hours in duration. A sheriff may charge a fee under this paragraph (gg) after the sheriff has provided a detailed accounting of his or her actual expenses to the person requesting such service. Actual transportation costs assessed pursuant to this paragraph (gg) shall only be charged once per location for each service or execution.

(1.5) If the cost of serving any writ of restitution or order of possession of premises may be provided at a lower cost to a county by a private provider, such county shall contract with a private provider pursuant to a competitive bidding system in which a contract to provide the service of such writs is awarded to the lowest bidder. The provisions of this subsection (1.5) shall not be deemed to authorize that services related to the execution of any writ of restitution or order of possession of premises be provided through private contracting.

As used in this section, "actual expenses" means those personnel and processing costs incurred in typing, processing, filing, and serving said process papers but does not include mileage. Subject to the limitations contained in this section, the fee for each type of service shall be fixed by ordinance or resolution.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 205, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2532.

L. 21:

p. 312, § 1.

C.L.

§ 7882.

CSA:

C. 66, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-7.

L. 55:

p. 390, § 1;

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-8.

L. 69:

p. 386, § 1.

L. 77:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(f), (1)(g), (1)(j), (1)(k), (1)(m) to (1)(t), and (1)(cc) to (1)(ff) amended and (2) added, p. 1429, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 78:

(1)(n) and (1)(w) amended, p. 442, § 1, effective March 3.

L. 84:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(w) to (1)(z) amended, p. 814, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 88:

(1)(j) and (1)(k) amended and (1)(gg) and (1.5) added, p. 1109, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(u) amended, p. 1238, § 8, effective May 22.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 747, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(a.5), (1)(b.5), (1)(c.5), (1)(d.5), (1)(e), (1)(f), (1)(g), (1)(h.5), (1)(j), (1)(k), (1)(m), (1)(o), (1)(r), (1)(s), (1)(t), (1)(bb), (1)(cc), (1)(dd), (1)(ee), (1)(ff), and (1)(gg) amended, p. 436, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(n) amended, p. 631, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(f), (1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(gg) amended, p. 263, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1)(b.5), (1)(d.5), and (1)(h.5) amended, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 396, § 1, effective August 11.

30-1-105. Constructive mileage not allowed. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 324, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2533.

C.L.

§ 7883.

CSA:

C. 66, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-9.

L. 64:

p. 384, § 11.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 397, § 2, effective August 11.

30-1-105.5. Two or more papers served on same person or different persons at same time and place in same action.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when any sheriff serves two or more papers on the same person, or serves papers on different persons at the same time and place in the same action, the sheriff shall charge the highest individual fee allowable pursuant to section 30-1-104 for the first process and an additional ten dollars for each subsequent process served.

If a county has adopted a zone- or zip code-based mileage fee structure, as that term is described in section 30-1-104 (1)(h.5)(II), when any sheriff serves two or more papers on the same person, or serves papers on different persons at the same time and place in the same action, the sheriff shall charge the single zone- or zip code-based mileage fee for the first process and an additional ten dollars for each subsequent process served.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 397, § 3, effective August 11.

30-1-106. Service must be made upon offer or tender of fees.

No sheriff shall refuse to serve any writ, summons, or notice requested by any person entitled to such service, when offered or tendered the fees allowed by law for such service; nor shall he or she charge, demand, or receive any greater sum or compensation or allowance.

A sheriff shall have the authority to establish billing accounts for licensed attorneys and licensed collection agencies that have a principal office located in the state.

A sheriff shall have the authority to develop and publish standardized procedures for billing the accounts authorized by subsection (2) of this section. Such procedures may include the ability to suspend the billing privileges of any entity for nonpayment of a fee upon demand or other good cause shown.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 324, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2534.

C.L.

§ 7884.

CSA:

C. 66, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-10.

L. 64:

p. 384, § 12.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 397, § 4, effective August 11.

30-1-107. Penalty for violation - duties.

Any sheriff who violates section 30-1-106 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five nor more than fifty dollars for each offense and is liable to any person aggrieved to pay all loss, damage, and expenses, including attorney fees in prosecuting or suing such officer, which such aggrieved person may sustain by reason of such violation. The sheriff and the sheriff's deputies shall be subject to section 30-1-106.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 324, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 2535.

C.L.

§ 7885.

CSA:

C. 66, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-11.

L. 64:

p. 384, § 13.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 398, § 5, effective August 11.

30-1-108. Schedule of fees posted.

All officers of this state who are required to collect fees for their services are required to make fair tables of their respective fees, and keep the same posted in their respective offices in some conspicuous place for the inspection of all persons who have business in such office; and, if any such officer neglects to keep a table of fees posted in his office, such officer, for each day of such neglect, shall forfeit and pay the sum of five dollars, to be recovered by action at law before the county court for the use of the county in which the offense has been committed.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 220, § 15.

R.S. 08:

§ 2545.

C.L.

§ 7893.

CSA:

C. 66, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-12.

L. 64:

p. 384, § 14.

30-1-109. Fee bill.

Any person liable for any costs or fees shall be entitled to receive on demand a certified bill of the same in which the items of service and the charges therefor shall be specifically stated.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 220, § 16.

R.S. 08:

§ 2546.

C.L.

§ 7894.

CSA:

C. 66, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-13.

30-1-110. Penalty for failure to serve.

When any clerk, sheriff, or other officer is required by any person, in good faith, to do any official act, or perform any official duty for which he is entitled to demand and receive a fee established by law, and if required to do so, he shall state to such person the amount which he is allowed by law to collect, and if, upon a tender to him of such amount, such officer willfully neglects or refuses to perform such act or duty, he is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten nor more than two hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 208, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 2548.

C.L.

§ 7896.

CSA:

C. 66, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-14.

L. 64:

p. 385, § 15.

30-1-111. Unauthorized fees - penalty.

If any officer whose fees are expressed and limited in this article takes or demands greater fees than prescribed for any service, or charges for said services and neglects or refuses to enter the same of record, or to perform the same, he shall forfeit to the party injured thereby the sum of fifty dollars to be recovered as actions of debt of the same amount are recoverable by law.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 220, § 17.

R.S. 08:

§ 2549.

L. 21:

p. 230, § 4.

C.L.

§ 7876.

L. 23:

p. 252, § 2.

CSA:

C. 66, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-15.

30-1-112. Fees paid monthly.

It is the duty of county sheriffs, county clerk and recorders, and all county officials to collect all fees of their respective offices and to pay the same to the county treasurer of their respective counties monthly; also to file monthly with the county treasurer an itemized statement of all fees so collected.

Commencing January 1, 1970, it is the duty of the clerks of district, juvenile, probate, and county courts to transmit monthly all fees to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the same in the state general fund.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 378, § 10.

C.L.

§ 7904.

CSA:

C. 66, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-15.

L. 58:

pp. 247, 249, §§ 13, 19, 20.

L. 63:

p. 492, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-16.

L. 64:

p. 462, § 3.

L. 69:

p. 256, § 31.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1582, § 39, effective July 10.

30-1-113. Officers to keep account of fees.

Each such officer, in a book provided for the purpose, shall keep a full, true, accurate, and minute account of all fees of his office, designating in corresponding columns the amount of all fees, and all payments received on account thereof, and shall also keep an account of all expenditures made by him on account of clerk hire and other necessary expenses. Such accounts shall always be open to the inspection and examination of the board of county commissioners, and the accounts of the clerks of the district court shall always be open to the inspection and examination of the state treasurer.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 313, § 19.

R.S. 08:

§ 2551.

C.L.

§ 7899.

CSA:

C. 66, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-16.

L. 58:

pp. 248, 249, §§ 16, 19, 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-17.

L. 69:

p. 386, § 2.

30-1-114. Monthly report of officers.

If required by the board of county commissioners, the county treasurer, sheriff, and county clerk and recorder, on the first Monday of each month during the officer's term of office, shall make to the chairman of the board of county commissioners a report in writing under oath of all the fees of the officer's office, of every name and description, and of all necessary expenses of clerk hire and other expenses for the month ending at the time of said report. If required, such report shall state fully the manner in which such fees accrued.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 313, § 20.

R.S. 08:

§ 2552.

C.L.

§ 7900.

CSA:

C. 66, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-18.

L. 64:

p. 385, § 16.

L. 69:

p. 256, § 32.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 964, § 2, effective June 1.

30-1-115. Commissioners to audit accounts.

It is the duty of the board of county commissioners to audit such accounts as soon as may be, and correct and adjust the same in accordance with the facts.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 314, § 21.

R.S. 08:

§ 2553.

C.L.

§ 7901.

CSA:

C. 66, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-19.

30-1-116. Officers shall collect fees in advance.

Except as provided in section 30-1-106, every officer shall collect every fee, as prescribed, for services performed by him or her in advance, if the same can be ascertained, and when any officer negligently or willfully fails to collect any such fee, the same shall be charged against his or her salary.

In proceedings where a public administrator, special administrator, receiver, or other person is appointed by the court to take possession of assets of an estate in which there are no funds immediately available to pay fees, the fees need not be paid in advance, but shall be paid as soon as funds become available.

No officer shall collect fees in advance in any collection action initiated pursuant to section 18-1.3-506, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 314, § 23.

R.S. 08:

§ 2550.

C.L.

§ 7898.

CSA:

C. 66, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-19.

L. 61:

p. 383, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-20.

L. 89:

(3) added, p. 887, § 2, effective April 6.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1542, § 286, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1057), ch. 118, p. 398, § 6, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

30-1-117. Refusal to pay fees to treasurer - penalty.

Any officer failing or refusing to pay over to the county treasurer or to the state treasurer the fees of the treasurer's office, as provided in section 30-1-112, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 314, § 24.

R.S. 08:

§ 2555.

C.L.

§ 7903.

CSA:

C. 66, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-20.

L. 58:

pp. 248, 249, §§ 17, 19, 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-21.

L. 69:

p. 386, § 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3247, § 498, effective March 1, 2022.

30-1-118. Mileage allowances. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 33:

p. 788, § 1.

CSA:

C. 66, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-22.

L. 69:

p. 391, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 628, § 3.

L. 75:

(1) repealed, p. 218, § 60, effective July 16.

L. 78:

Entire section amended, p. 443, § 2, effective March 3.

L. 80:

Entire section repealed, p. 657, effective July 1.

30-1-119. Separate fee funds kept - definition.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all fees collected by county officers except those collected pursuant to section 30-1-102 (3) shall be paid over to the county treasurer and shall be kept by him in separate funds to be known as:

The "sheriff's fee fund";

The "county clerk's fee fund";

The "county treasurer's commission and fee fund".

The revenues generated annually from the fee for committing and discharging prisoners authorized pursuant to section 30-1-104 (1)(n) must be distributed as follows:

The county shall expend an amount equal to twenty percent of the revenues generated annually from the fee to administer a community-based treatment program for the treatment of offenders with a behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorder committed or discharged by the county if the county has established, or the board of county commissioners chooses to establish, such a community-based treatment program.

For purposes of this subsection (2)(a), "community-based treatment program" means a community-based program that provides management and treatment services to persons with behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorders in the criminal or juvenile justice system, designed, at a minimum, to reduce recidivism and hospitalization of these persons.

The county shall expend an amount equal to twenty percent of the revenues generated annually from the fee for training of the sheriff and deputy sheriffs and other local law enforcement officers. The training may include a crisis intervention training component to meet the needs of offenders with behavioral or mental health disorders; and

The county shall expend the balance of the revenues generated annually from the fee for law-enforcement-related expenditures to defray the costs of processing prisoners into and out of custody.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 337, § 16.

CSA:

C. 66, § 58(16).

CRS 53:

§ 56-4-22.

L. 58:

pp. 248, 249, §§ 18-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 56-4-23.

L. 64:

p. 385, § 17.

L. 69:

p. 256, § 33.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 1202, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 631, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(b) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1378, § 298, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.